Utah statutes.
36-11-405.   Construction and interpretation -- Freedom of expression, participation, and press.

No provision of this chapter may be construed, interpreted, or enforced so as to limit, impair, abridge, or destroy any person's right of freedom of expression and participation in government processes or freedom of the press.

